Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.900

Application of certain laws to felonies committed before, on, or after certain dates.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the following sections of law do not apply to any felony offense committed on or after July 1, 1984: RCW 9.95.010, 9.95.011, 9.95.013, 9.95.015, 9.95.017, 9.95.040, 9.95.045, 9.95.047, 9.95.052, 9.95.080, 9.95.100, 9.95.115, 9.95.116, 9.95.120, 9.95.124, 9.95.125, 9.95.130, 9.95.190, 9.95.200, 9.95.204, * 9.95.206, 9.95.210, * 9.95.212, 9.95.214, 9.95.220, 9.95.230, 9.95.240, 9.95.250, 9.95.260, 9.95.265, 9.95.280, 9.95.290, 9.95.310, 9.95.320, 9.95.330, 9.95.340, 9.95.350, 9.95.360, 9.95.370, 72.04A.070, and 72.04A.080.

(2) The following sections apply to any felony offense committed before July 1, 1984, and to any offense sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 and committed on or after July 1, 2001: RCW 9.95.003, 9.95.005, 9.95.007, 9.95.020, 9.95.030, 9.95.031, 9.95.032, 9.95.055, 9.95.060, 9.95.062, 9.95.063, 9.95.064, 9.95.070, 9.95.090, 9.95.110, 9.95.121, 9.95.122, 9.95.123, 9.95.126, 9.95.140, 9.95.150, 9.95.160, 9.95.170, 9.95.300, and 9.96.050.

[ 2009 c 28 s 31; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 353; 1981 c 137 s 32.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.95.206 and 9.95.212 were repealed by 2009 c 375 s 16.

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.